District of Columbia statutes.
31-3425

Filings and reports as public documents.

All applications, filings, and reports required under this chapter shall be treated as public documents, except those which are trade secrets or privileged or confidential quality assurance, commercial, and financial information, other than any annual financial statement that may be required under § 31-3408 [repealed].

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 27, 44 DCR 818
1981 Ed., § 35-4525.